Washington statutes.
RCW 4.16.100

Actions limited to two years.

Within two years:

(1) An action for libel, slander, assault, assault and battery, or false imprisonment.

(2) An action upon a statute for a forfeiture or penalty to the state.

[Code 1881 s 29; 1877 p 8 s 29; 1869 p 9 s 29; 1854 p 363 s 5; RRS s 160.]

NOTES:

Limitation of action for recovery of transportation charges: RCW 81.28.270.